District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-1207.03

Economic Development Finance Corporation—Established; composition; appointment; term of office; vacancies; quorum; reimbursement for expenses.

Repealed.

History

June 29, 1984, D.C. Law 5-89, § 4, 31 DCR 2514
March. 16, 1985, D.C. Law 5-186, § 2, 32 DCR 870
March 21, 1995, D.C. Law 10-236, § 5(b), 42 DCR 33
D.C. Law 12-144, § 31(b)(2), 45 DCR 3747
Oct. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-213, § 7, 49 DCR 8140

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-2213.

Effective Dates

Section 33(b)(2) of D.C. Law 12-144 provided that § 31(b) shall take effect on the latter of: (A) the effective Dates of this act; or (B) the Dates determined by the Board, but not later than one year after the initial meeting of the Board.

Expiration of Law

Expiration of Law 10-236

Section 6(b) of D.C. Law 10-236 provided that the act shall expire 3 years after having taken effect. D.C. Law 10-236, which had amended (b), became effective on March 21, 1995.

Editor's Notes

Council determination of satisfactory commitment from private sources: Pursuant to Resolution 6-557, the “Economic Development Finance Corporation Commitment Resolution of 1986,” effective February 25, 1986, the Council determined that there were satisfactory commitments from private sources to warrant the expenditure of public funds for the activities of the District of Columbia Economic Development Finance Corporation.